Hawaii statutes.
§454F-16 Mortgage call reports. Each
licensee and exempt sponsoring mortgage loan originator company, as may be
required by title 12 United States Code
sections 5101 to 5116, shall submit quarterly to NMLS
reports of condition, using the form entitled "FINANCIAL
CONDITION" or "RESIDENTIAL MORTGAGE LOAN ACTIVITY", which shall
be in the form and contain the information as NMLS may
require. [L Sp 2009, c 32, pt of §2; am L 2010, c 84, §21; am L 2013, c 168, §16;
am L 2014, c 198, §7]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next